Massachusetts, session 194th, H3895.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, any independent
distributive occupations schools located in the City of Lynn may offer instruction in part time
and evening classes whereas attendance upon such day or part time classes shall be restricted to
those of at least thirteen years of age; and upon such evening classes, to those over sixteen years
of age.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 1